District of Columbia statutes.
29-925

Share and membership certificates; issuance and contents.

No certificate for share or membership capital shall be issued until the par value thereof has been paid for in full. A full or condensed statement of the requirements of §§ 29-913, 29-914, 29-915, and 29-927 shall be printed upon each certificate issued by an association.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-925.
1981 Ed., § 29-1125.
1973 Ed., § 29-825.